District of Columbia statutes.
34-1602

Laboratory for testing gas of Washington Gas Light Company.

A laboratory shall be provided and fitted up by the Washington Gas Light Company, subject to the approval of the Public Service Commission, in the central part of the City of Washington, at a distance as near as may be, of 2,000 feet from any gasworks, and furnished with suitable apparatus for the transaction of the business of the Inspector and Assistant Inspectors of Gas and Meters, for which it is intended, and the laboratory shall be kept open on all business days between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m.; provided, that the cost of fitting up said laboratory shall be paid for by each gas company in the District of Columbia in proportion to their sale of gas for the year 1873.

History

June 23, 1874, 18 Stat. 278, ch. 480, § 3
Mar. 3, 1893, 27 Stat. 543, ch. 199
Mar. 11, 1902, 32 Stat. 63, ch. 181
Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21

Cross References

Gas and electric meters, inspections, rules and regulations, see § 34-303.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1101.
1973 Ed., § 43-1201.